Utah statutes.
53A-21-301.   Capital Outlay Enrollment Growth Program -- Definitions.
(1)  There is created the Capital Outlay Enrollment Growth Program to provide
capital outlay funding to school districts experiencing net enrollment
increases.
(2)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Average annual net enrollment increase" means the quotient of:
(i) (A)  enrollment in the current year, based on October 1 enrollment counts;
minus
(B)  enrollment in the year three years prior, based on October 1 enrollment
counts; divided by
(ii)  three.
(b)  "Eligible district" or "eligible school district" means a school district
that:
(i)  has an average annual net enrollment increase; and
(ii)  has a prior year property tax base per student that is less than two
times the prior year statewide average property tax base per student.
